Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB398.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5302(a) and (b)(10) of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 5302. Aircraft for official use.(a) General rule.--The department may purchase or lease and maintain aircraft required for the proper conduct of the official business of the Commonwealth agencies and the General Assembly. The total cost, including all ordinary and necessary expenses for the use of such aircraft, shall be charged by the department to the using agency or the General Assembly. The amount of such charge shall be paid into the Aviation Restricted Account and be credited to the amounts appropriated therefrom for the use of the department. All amounts so credited are 12345678910111213141516171819 hereby appropriated to the department for the same purposes as other appropriations out of the Aviation Restricted Account for the use of the department.(a.1) Attestation of official business.--An aircraft authorized under this section may only be used by Commonwealth agencies and the General Assembly for flights which are entirely for official business. A public official or public employee who receives a flight on an aircraft authorized under this section shall sign a declaration subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) stating that the trip is exclusively for official business and that the public official or public employee will not engage in political activities or attend a sporting event after arrival and before departure on the return flight, even if the political activities or attendance at sporting events are incidental to the official business which is the purpose of the flight.(a.2) Prohibited passengers.--A lobbyist, a principal or an individual who owns, is employed or is otherwise under contract with a lobbyist or principal may not receive a flight on an aircraft authorized under this section.(b) Flight log required.--The department shall establish and maintain a log of flights using aircraft authorized under this section. This log shall be publicly accessible on the department's Internet website and shall be updated monthly. At minimum, the information made available on the department's Internet website shall include:* * *(10) [Public] The of ficial business that is the purpose of the trip[.], which shall be described with particularity and shall include, at a minimum, the following:20250HB0398PN0367 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) For attendance at an event, the name of the event, the sponsor of the event and whether the event is open to the public.(ii) For attendance at a meeting, the subject of the meeting and the name of each individual who attended the meeting.* * *(d) Out-of-state flights.--An aircraft authorized under this section may not fly to an airport outside of this Commonwealth, except for an emergency which is attested to in writing by the executive director of the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Lobbyist." As defined in 65 Pa.C.S. § 13A03 (relating to definitions)."Principal." As defined in 65 Pa.C.S. § 13A03. Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0398PN0367 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819